Missouri, session 2026, SB898.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 162, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
five new sections, to be known as sections 162.2000, 162.2005,
162.2015, 162.2025, and 162.2035, to read as follows:
162.2000. 1. As used in sections 162.2000 to
162.2035, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise,
the following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the department of elementary and
secondary education;
(2) "Early education district", a special district, as
such term is defined in section 115.013, that is formed for
purposes of providing free public prekindergarten programs
to eligible children pursuant to the provisions of sections
162.2000 to 162.2035;
(3) "Eligible child", any child who reaches the age of
four before the first day of August of the school year
beginning in that calendar year, but who is not yet eligible
for kindergarten pursuant to the provisions of section
160.053, and who is not enumerated for payments pursuant to
section 163.018.

SB 898 2
2. An early education district may be established in a
county with more than one million inhabitants pursuant to
the provisions of sections 162.2000 to 162.2035 for purposes
of providing free public prekindergarten programs for
eligible children who reside within the county.
3. The curriculum of an early education district shall
be so designed as to be developmentally appropriate and
aligned with the early childhood education standards
established pursuant to the provisions of section 161.213
and any other standards for early childhood education and
early childhood special education established by the
department.
4. The board of education of an early education
district may establish or partner with schools to provide
prekindergarten programs for eligible children within any
public school district comprising the early education
district. The board may additionally establish programs for
any such children within any school district included in the
early education district.
5. Upon the establishment of an early education
district, the school districts located in the same county as
the early education district and the state board of
education shall continue to provide services formerly
provided to eligible children residing in the county until
the resources of the early education district are sufficient
to permit its assuming such responsibilities.
6. An early education district shall comply with any
accountability metrics for early childhood education
established by the department, and shall provide reasonable
assistance to the department in the development of such
accountability metrics for early childhood programming.

SB 898 3
7. The department shall inspect all programs for
eligible children established by an early education district
pursuant to the provisions of sections 162.2000 to
162.2035. Upon the department's approval, and upon the levy
of an initial property tax for the early education district
as provided in section 162.2035, the following provisions
shall apply:
(1) The district shall receive state aid for eligible
children enrolled in such district in an amount equal to the
product of the district's weighted average daily attendance
multiplied by the state adequacy target multiplied by the
dollar value modifier, as such terms are defined in section
163.011, provided that any children who are otherwise
enumerated in the pupil count of a school district for
payment pursuant to the provisions of section 163.018 shall
not be included in such calculation;
(2) The district shall receive state aid pursuant to
the provisions of section 162.700 to provide special
education services for eligible children in the same manner
as such funds are appropriated to other school districts;
(3) The district shall receive state aid pursuant to
the provisions of section 163.172 to fund teacher salaries
in the same manner as other school districts receive such
state aid; and
(4) All teachers and other personnel of such district
shall be eligible for career pay supplements and retirement
allowances in the same manner as other public school
employees are eligible for career pay supplements and
retirement allowances pursuant to the provisions of sections
168.500 to 168.515 and chapter 169.
8. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions

SB 898 4
of sections 162.2000 to 162.2035. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
162.2005. 1. An early education district may be
established in any county with more than one million
inhabitants only as permitted pursuant to the provisions of
this section.
2. (1) When the voters of the county desire to form
an early education district, a petition signed by voters of
the county in a number equal to at least five percent of the
number of votes cast for school board members, in the
aggregate, in the most recent school board election for each
school district located wholly within the county, shall be
submitted to the board of election commissioners. The
petition shall request that a proposal be submitted to the
voters of the county for the organization of an early
education district embracing the entire area of the county
for the purpose of providing free public prekindergarten
programs for eligible children who reside in the county.
(2) Within thirty days of receipt of the petition
described in subdivision (1) of this subsection, the board
of election commissioners shall verify the signatures and
cause the proposal to be submitted to the voters of the

SB 898 5
county at the next general municipal election in accordance
with the provisions of chapter 115.
3. The question shall be submitted to qualified voters
in substantially the following form:
Shall there be organized an early education
district in ______ (county name), state of
Missouri, for the purpose of providing public
prekindergarten programs under the direction of
the Missouri department of elementary and
secondary education for children in the year
before kindergarten eligibility, embracing the
entire area of the county, having the power to
impose a property tax not to exceed the annual
rate of fifty-two cents on each hundred dollars
assessed valuation, and any additional tax that
is approved hereafter by vote thereon, and to be
known as "The Early Education District of
______", as requested by a petition filed on the
______ day of ______, 20______?
4. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by
the qualified voters in the county are in favor of the
measure, then the provisions of subsection 1 of this section
shall become effective. If a majority of the votes cast on
the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are
opposed to the measure, then the provisions of subsection 1
of this section shall not become effective unless and until
the measure is resubmitted pursuant to the provisions of
this section to the qualified voters and such question is
approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the
same measure.
5. When a new early education district is organized,
it shall be a body corporate and political subdivision of

SB 898 6
the state and shall be known as "The Early Education
District of ______" (a name selected by the governing board)
and, in that name, may sue and be sued, levy and collect
taxes within the limitations of the Constitution of Missouri
and section 162.2035, issue bonds, and possess the same
corporate powers as seven-director school districts, other
than urban districts.
162.2015. 1. The board of education of an early
education district shall consist of seven members to be
elected by the qualified voters of such district as provided
in section 162.2025. The board shall perform the same
duties and be subject to the same liabilities as the board
of a seven-director school district, other than an urban
district, acting under the general school laws of the state
of Missouri.
2. The board of education of an early education
district shall have the power to:
(1) Establish and operate public prekindergarten
programs for eligible children residing in the district
subject to rules and regulations promulgated by the
department pursuant to the provisions of sections 162.2000
to 162.2035;
(2) Develop and adopt the annual budget;
(3) Authorize all tax levies by two-thirds approval of
the board of education prior to submission of the tax levy
proposal to the voters of the district as provided by law;
(4) Annually develop a five-year plan for the
operation and management of the district. In developing the
plan, the board of education shall solicit a broad range of
public input. The plan shall contain, but shall not be
limited to, the following:
(a) The delivery of services;

SB 898 7
(b) The structure, governance, administration, and
financial management of the district;
(c) Cooperation with component school districts; and
(d) Responsiveness to the needs and concerns of the
citizens of the early education district;
(5) Employ administrators, teachers, and other
personnel necessary to provide public prekindergarten
programs to eligible children resident within the district's
boundaries;
(6) Work with the department and other entities
engaged in accreditation of early childhood programming to
create statewide accountability metrics for early childhood
education, and to take all necessary actions to comply with
any such accountability metrics established by the
department;
(7) Ensure that there is no coercion or interference
with any parent of a pupil of the early education district
on account of the parent having exercised any rights under
any law affecting the education of the pupil; and
(8) Do such other things as are necessary and
incidental to any of the powers set forth in sections
162.2000 to 162.2035 or in the laws applicable to seven-
director school districts, except urban districts.
162.2025. 1. Candidates for membership on the board
of education of an early education district shall be voters
of the early education district who have resided within the
state for one year preceding the election and who are at
least twenty-four years of age. All candidates shall file
their declarations of candidacy with the secretary of the
state board of education for the initial election of board
members and shall file their declarations of candidacy with

SB 898 8
the board of education of the early education district for
all subsequent elections of board members.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
board members of an early education district shall be
elected at large in municipal elections conducted in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 115. The term of
office of each member of the board of education shall be
three years, except that of the initial elected board
members, the seven candidates receiving the highest number
of votes cast shall be elected as follows:
(1) The three candidates receiving the highest number
of votes cast shall be elected for terms of three years each;
(2) The two candidates receiving the next highest
number of votes cast shall be elected for terms of two years
each; and
(3) The two candidates receiving the next highest
number of votes cast shall be elected for terms of one year
each.
3. That part of the year between the date of the
election of board members and the municipal election day of
the following year is considered a full year in the terms of
the members elected. All board members shall serve until
their successors are elected and qualified. Any vacancy
occurring in the unexpired term of office of any board
member shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired
term by the remaining members of the board; except that if
there are more than two vacancies at any one time, the
county board of commissioners upon receiving written notice
of the vacancies shall fill the vacancies by appointment.
The person appointed shall hold office until the next
municipal election, when a board member shall be elected for

SB 898 9
the unexpired term. The state board of education shall
issue certificates of election to the board members elected.
4. No member of the board of education of an early
education district shall:
(1) Vote on, solicit, transact, offer, or accept any
contract between the early education district and any
corporation, partnership, association, or other organization
in which that member of the board of education has a
financial interest, unless otherwise provided in this
section, excluding interests owned prior to such member's
election;
(2) Be a paid employee of the board of education of
the early education district while serving; or
(3) Vote on, solicit, transact, offer, or accept any
contract or procurement in which that board member shall
have a direct or indirect beneficial interest, unless:
(a) The material facts as to such member's
relationship or interest and as to the contract or
transaction are disclosed in writing and are known to the
board, and such board, in good faith, authorizes the
contract or transaction by the affirmative vote of the
majority of the disinterested members; and
(b) Such member's relationship or interest in such
contract or transaction shall not be voted upon by such
interested member.
162.2035. 1. The initial tax imposed on property
subject to the taxing power of an early education district
under Article X, Section 11(a) of the Constitution of
Missouri shall not exceed the annual rate of fifty-two cents
on each hundred dollars assessed valuation, which tax rate
shall be used for the district's programs for the education

SB 898 10
of eligible children as provided in sections 162.2000 to
162.2035.
2. Increases in the tax rate may be made with voter
approval in the same manner as provided in chapter 164 for
other school districts.
3. All real and tangible personal property owned by
railroads, street railways, bridge companies, telegraph
companies, electric light and power companies, electric
transmission line companies, pipeline companies, express
companies, airline companies, and other companies and public
utilities whose property is assessed by the state tax
commission shall be taxed at the same rate of taxation
levied on other property in the early education district.
Such property shall be taxed in the same manner and to the
same extent as property that is subject to assessment and
taxation for general county purposes, and all of the
provisions of chapters 151, 153, 154, and 155 shall apply to
taxation by early education districts to the same extent as
if early education districts were specifically included in
the provisions contained in chapters 151, 153, 154, and 155,
except that the taxes levied by early education districts
shall not be included for the purpose of determining the
average school levy for the other school districts in the
county in which they are situated. The taxes levied against
the property by early education districts shall be collected
in the same manner as general county taxes.
✓